fr: Articles de surveillance pour animaux de compagnie inclus: Pochette de transport; Lancettes; Autopiqueur; Bandelettes de test; Autre
ro-RO: Articole de monitorizare a animalelor de companie incluse: Geantă de transport; Lanțete; Dispozitiv de înțepare; Benzi de testare; Altele
en: Pet monitor items included: Carrying case; Lancets; Lancing device; Test strips; Other
bg-BG: Включени елементи за монитор за домашни любимци: Клетка за пренасяне; Ланцети; Устройството за убождане; Тестови ленти; Други
vi: Bao gồm các vật dụng theo dõi thú cưng: Hộp đựng; Lưỡi chích; Bút lấy máu; Que thử; Khác
hr-HR: Uključeni predmeti za praćenje zdravlja kućnih ljubimaca: Torba za nošenje; Lancete; Lancetari; Test-trakice; Ostalo
zh-CN: 包括宠物监视器项目: 手提箱; 柳叶刀; 采血器; 测试条; 其他
pt-BR: Itens para monitorar animais de estimação incluídos: Maleta; Lancetas; Lancetadores; Tiras de teste; Outro
da: Elementer til kæledyrsmonitor inkluderet: Bæretaske; Lancetter; Prikkeanordning; Teststrimler; Andet
sk-SK: Vrátane monitora domácich zvierat: Puzdro na prenášanie; Lancety; Odberové pero; Testovacie prúžky; Iné
th: รวมรายการเฝ้าติดตามสัตว์เลี้ยง: กระเป๋าพกพา; เข็มเจาะเลือด; อุปกรณ์เจาะเลือด; แถบทดสอบต่างๆ; อื่นๆ
es: Artículos de monitor de mascotas incluidos: Estuche de transporte; Lancetas; Dispositivo de punción; Tiras de prueba; Otros
tr: Evcil hayvan izleme ürünleri dahil: Taşıma çantası; Lansetler; Lanset cihazı; Test şeritleri; Diğer
nl: Inclusief huisdiermonitorartikelen: Draagtas; Lancetten; Prikapparaat; Teststrips; Andere
fi: Mukana lemmikkimonitorituotteita: Kantokotelo; Lansetit; Lansettilaite; Testiliuskat; Muu
nb: Inkluderte artikler for kjæledyrovervåkning: Bærevesker; Lansetter; Lansettapparater; Teststrimler; Annet
ja: ペットモニターのアイテム (詳細): 持ち運び用ケース; ランセット; ランシングデバイス; テストストリップ; その他
pt-PT: Itens do monitor para animais de estimação incluídos: Caixa de transporte; Lancetas; Dispositivo de lancetagem; Tiras de teste; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αντικείμενα παρακολούθησης κατοικιδίων: Θήκη μεταφοράς; Νυστέρια; Εργαλείο τομής; Ταινίες ελέγχου; Άλλο
ru: Состав комплекта монитора для домашних животных: Чехол для переноски; Ланцеты; Устройство для прокалывания; Тест-полоски; Другое
de: Inbegriffene Haustierüberwachungsartikel: Transporttasche; Lanzetten; Stechhilfe; Teststreifen; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys naminių gyvūnų gliukometro priedai: Nešiojamas dėklas; Lancetai; Lancetas; Testavimo juostelės; Kita
sl-SI: Vključeni izdelki za nadzor hišnih ljubljenčkov: Torba za prenašanje; Lancete; Naprava za lansiranje; Testni lističi; Drugo
cs: Obsažené součásti zvířecí chůvičky: Přepravní kufřík; Lancety; Odběrové pero; Testovací proužky; Jiné
zh-TW: 寵物監視器含有品項: 行李箱; 採血針; 採血裝置; 試紙; 其他
ko: 반려동물 모니터 품목 포함: 휴대용 케이스; 랜싯; 채혈기; 테스트지; 기타
pl: W zestawie elementy monitorujące zwierzęta: Etui; Lancety; Nakłuwacz; Paski testowe; Inne
it: Articoli per il monitoraggio degli animali inclusi: Valigetta; Lancette; Dispositivo pungidito; Strisce reattive; Altro
sv: Tillbehör för djurvakt ingår: Bärfodral; Lancetter; Lansettenhet; Testremsor; Övrigt
hu: Kisállat mérőeszközhöz mellékelt cikkek: Hordtáska; Szikék; Szúróeszköz; Tesztcsíkok; Egyéb